Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Article 3. Valuation of Other Securities

§ 26-6-301.
Valuation of bonds and other debt securities.

The commissioner may, by rule or regulation, require that any bond or other evidence of debt held by an insurer be valued in accordance with the most recent published valuation standards of the National Association of Insurance Commissioners. Any bonds or other evidences of debt as to which the National Association of Insurance Commissioners has not published valuation standards in its valuations of securities manual, if amply secured and not in default as to principal or interest, shall be valued as follows:

If purchased at par, at the par value;

If purchased above or below par, on the basis of the purchase price adjusted so as to bring the value to par at maturity and so as to yield in the meantime the effective rate of interest at which the purchase was made, or instead of this method, according to an accepted method of valuation the commissioner approves;

Purchase price shall in no case be taken at a higher figure than the actual fair value at the time of acquisition regardless of how acquired, plus actual brokerage, transfer, postage or express charges paid in the acquisition of the securities;

Unless otherwise provided by valuation the commissioner establishes or approves, no such security shall be carried at above the call price for the entire issue during any period within which the security may be called.

The commissioner has full discretion in determining the method of calculating values according to the rules set forth in this section.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 142, § 12; R.S. 1931, § 57-212; C.S. 1945, § 52-312; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-72, 26.1-105; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 105; 1977, ch. 78, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 26-6-112; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 1992, ch. 59, § 2; 2001, ch. 9, § 1.

§ 26-6-302.
Valuation of other securities.

The commissioner may, by rule or regulation, require that securities other than securities referred to in W.S.

26-6-301

and except as provided in W.S. 26-16-502(a)(iv), held by an insurer, be valued in accordance with the most recent published valuation standards of the National Association of Insurance Commissioners. At the commissioner’s discretion, securities as to which the National Association of Insurance Commissioners has not published valuation standards shall be valued at their fair value, or at their appraised value or at prices the commissioner determines as representing their fair value.

Preferred or guaranteed stocks or shares while paying full dividends may be carried at a fixed value instead of fair value at the commissioner’s discretion and in accordance with a method of computation he approves.

The stock of an insurer’s subsidiary shall be valued on the basis of the value of only those assets of the subsidiary as would constitute lawful investments of the insurer if acquired or held directly by the insurer.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 106; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-106; Laws 1973, ch. 181, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 26-6-113; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 1992, ch. 59, § 2; 2001, ch. 9, § 1.

§ 26-6-303.
Valuation of real and personal property.

All real property shall be valued as set forth in the most recent National Association of Insurance Commissioners’ accounting practices and procedures manual.

through (iii) Repealed by Laws 1994, ch. 76, § 3.

and (v) Repealed by Laws 2001, ch. 9, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 1994, ch. 76, § 3.

Personal property acquired pursuant to loans on the security of chattels made in accordance with W.S.

26-7-111

shall not be valued at an amount greater than the unpaid balance of principal on the defaulted loan at the date of acquisition together with taxes and expenses incurred in connection with the acquisition, or the fair value of the property, whichever is less.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 107; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-107; W.S. 1977, § 26-6-114; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 1994, ch. 76, §§ 2, 3; 2001, ch. 9, §§ 1, 2.

§ 26-6-304.
Valuation of purchase money mortgages.

Purchase money mortgages on real property shall be valued in accordance with the most recent National Association of Insurance Commissioners’ accounting practices and procedures manual.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 108; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-108; W.S. 1977, § 26-6-115; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 2001, ch. 9, § 1.

§ 26-6-305.
“Insolvency” and “impairment” defined.

An insurer is insolvent if its total assets, as in this chapter provided, are less than its total liabilities, excluding as a liability, as to a stock insurer, the aggregate par value of its outstanding capital stock.

An insurer is impaired if:

As to a stock insurer, the sum of its assets is less than the sum of:

Its liabilities;

The aggregate par value of its outstanding capital stock; and

The amount of surplus the insurer is required to maintain for the kinds of insurance transacted.

As to a mutual or reciprocal insurer, the sum of its assets is less than the sum of its liabilities and the amount of surplus the insurer is required to maintain for the kinds of insurance transacted.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 109; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-109; W.S. 1977, § 26-6-116; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Cross references. —

For another definition of “impairment” and “insolvency,” see §

26-28-101

.

As to rehabilitation and liquidation of insurance companies, see §§

26-28-101

through

26-28-131

.